Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
CHAPTER 393 Escheats

393.010.
Definitions for chapter — Application of chapter. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1605a, 1610: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 1; 1962, ch. 144, § 1; 1994, ch. 58, § 2, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 95, § 1, effective June 24, 2003; 2012, ch. 32, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.015.
Use of abandoned property funds to support Commonwealth postsecondary education prepaid tuition trust fund. [Repealed.]

393.020.
Property subject to escheat.

If any property having a situs in this state has been devised or bequeathed to any person and is not claimed by that person or by his heirs, distributees, or devisees within three (3) years after the death of the testator, or if the owner of any property having a situs in this state dies without heirs or distributees entitled to it and without disposing of it by will, it shall vest in the state, subject to all legal and equitable demands. Any property abandoned by the owner, except a perfect title to a corporeal hereditament, shall vest in the state, subject to all legal and equitable demands. Any property that vests in the state under this section shall be liquidated, and the proceeds, less costs, fees, and expenses incidental to all legal proceedings of the liquidation shall be paid to the department.

History.

1606; 1994, ch. 58, § 3, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 83, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 95, § 7, effective June 24, 2003.

393.022.
Escheat of United States savings bonds to Commonwealth.

As used in this section:

“Book-entry bond” means a savings bond maintained by the United States Treasury in electronic or paperless form as a computer record;

“Definitive bond” means a savings bond issued by the United States Treasury in paper form;

“Final maturity” means the date a United States savings bond ceases to earn interest; and

“United States savings bond” means a book-entry bond or definitive bond issued by the United States Treasury.

This section shall apply to the escheat of United States savings bonds to the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

A United States savings bond held or owing in this state by any person, or issued or owed in the course of a holder’s business, or by a state or other government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, and all proceeds thereof, shall be presumed abandoned in this state if:

The last known address of the owner of the United States savings bond is in this state; and

The United States savings bond has remained unclaimed and unredeemed for three (3) years after final maturity.

United States savings bonds which are presumed abandoned under subsection (3) of this section shall escheat to the Commonwealth of Kentucky three (3) years after becoming abandoned property, and all property rights and legal title to and ownership of the United States savings bonds or proceeds from the bonds, including all rights, powers, and privileges of survivorship of any owner, co-owner, or beneficiary, shall vest solely in the Commonwealth of Kentucky according to the procedure set forth in subsections (5) to (8) of this section.

If no claim has been filed in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, the department shall commence a civil action in the Franklin Circuit Court for a determination that United States savings bonds have escheated to the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the Commonwealth of Kentucky is the owner of the savings bonds.

The department shall provide notice of the action by publication in at least two (2) newspapers of statewide circulation in accordance with the provisions of KRS

424.110

to

424.215

.

The notice shall list all persons to be served and shall notify those persons that:

The person has been sued in a named court;

The person must answer the petition or other pleading or otherwise respond, on or before a specified date not less than fifty (50) days after the date the notice is first published; and

If the person does not answer or otherwise respond, the petition or other pleading shall be taken as true and judgment, the nature of which shall be stated, will be rendered accordingly.

Prior to providing notice by publication as required by subsection (6) of this section, the Treasurer or his or her designee shall file with the court an affidavit stating all the following that apply:

The residences of all named persons sought to be served, if known;

The names of all persons whose residences are unknown after reasonable effort to ascertain them; and

The specific efforts made to ascertain the unknown residences;

That the affiant has made a reasonable but unsuccessful effort to ascertain the names and residences of any persons sought to be served as unknown parties, and the specific efforts made to ascertain the names and residences;

That the department is unable to obtain service of summons on the persons in the state; and

That the case is one in which the department, with due diligence, is unable to serve summons on the person in this state and:

The case relates to personal property in this state, if any person has or claims an interest in the property; or

In which the relief demanded consists wholly or partly in excluding the person from any interest in the property.

If:

No person files a claim or appears at the hearing to substantiate a claim; or

The court determines that a claimant is not entitled to the property claimed by the claimant;

then the court, if satisfied by the evidence that the department has substantially complied with the laws of the Commonwealth, shall enter a judgment that the subject United States savings bonds have escheated to the Commonwealth of Kentucky, and all property rights and legal title to and ownership of the United States savings bonds or proceeds from the bonds, including all rights, powers, and privileges of survivorship of any owner, co-owner, or beneficiary, shall vest solely in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

The department shall redeem the United States savings bonds escheated to the Commonwealth, and the proceeds from the redemption shall be deposited into a separate subsidiary account of the abandoned property fund.

After a judgment of escheat has been entered pursuant to subsection (8) of this section, the Treasurer or his or her designee may, at his or her discretion, make full or partial payment of requests for the proceeds of United States savings bonds to persons to whom, in the opinion of the Treasurer or his or her designee, the Commonwealth should in fairness and equity allow payment.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 102, § 4, effective April 10, 2014.

393.025.
Owner of abandoned property loses income or increments accruing thereafter. [Repealed.]

393.030.
Disposition of property subject to escheat.

The personal representative of a person, any part of whose property is not distributed by will, and who died without heirs or distributees entitled to it shall settle their accounts within one (1) year after qualifying, and pay to the department the proceeds of all personal property, first deducting the proper legal liabilities of the estate.

If the whole personal property cannot be settled and the accounts closed within one year, the settlement as far as practicable, shall then be made and the proceeds paid to the department, and the residue shall be settled and paid as soon thereafter as can be properly done.

The personal representative shall take possession of the real property of the decedent not disposed of by his will, and rent it out from year to year until it is otherwise legally disposed of, and pay the net proceeds to the department.

The personal representative shall also make out and transmit to the department a description of the quantity, quality, and estimated value of the real property and its probable annual profits.

History.

1607; 1994, ch. 58, § 4, effective March 10, 1994.

393.040.
Procedure if legacy or devise is not claimed.

If any devisee or legatee, or his heir, devisee, or distributee, has failed for seven (7) years to claim his legacy or devise, the personal representative of the testator, or other person possessing it shall, after deducting the legal liabilities thereon, pay and deliver it and the net profits from it to the department.

History.

1608; 1994, ch. 58, § 5, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 83, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 58 and 83 which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

393.050.
Presumption of death after seven years — Disposition of property.

Except as provided in KRS

422.132

, when a person owning any property having a situs in this state is not known to be living for seven (7) successive years, and neither he nor his heirs, devisees, or distributees can be located or proved to have been living for seven (7) successive years, he shall be presumed to have died without heirs, devisees, or distributees, and his property shall be liquidated and the proceeds, less costs incident to the liquidation and any legal proceedings, and the liabilities which have been properly claimed and approved against it, shall be paid to the department.

History.

1609: amend. Acts 1994, ch. 58, § 6, effective March 10, 1994; 2002, ch. 57, § 2, effective July 15, 2002.

393.060.
Presumption of abandonment of certain property held by bank or financial organization. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1610: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 6; 1976, ch. 255, § 1; 1994, ch. 83, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 560, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2008, ch. 132, § 12, effective April 24, 2008; repealed and reenact., Acts 2009, ch. 86, § 11, effective March 24, 2009; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.062.
Presumption of abandonment of unclaimed funds held by life insurance corporation. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 2, effective June 16, 1960; 2003, ch. 95, § 8, effective June 24, 2003; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.063.
Treatment of refunds of workers’ compensation special fund assessments held by an insurance carrier and owed to an insured employer.

Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary, refunds of workers’ compensation special fund assessments levied in accordance with KRS

342.122

shall be deemed “unclaimed refunds” if held by an insurance carrier and owed to an insured employer.

For purposes of this section, “unclaimed refunds” means all unremitted workers’ compensation special fund assessments collected by a carrier, as defined in KRS 342.0011(6), in excess of the applicable special fund assessment rate, owing and unpaid to an insured employer after the Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission has made a determination that the carrier has made a reasonable attempt to return the unclaimed refunds to the insured employer.

Unclaimed refunds shall be remitted by the insurance carrier to the Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission, created under KRS

342.1223

, and shall be credited to the benefit reserve fund, created under KRS

342.1229

, within the Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission. Unclaimed refunds remitted to the Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission and held by that commission for more than two (2) years shall become the property of the benefit reserve fund.

The unclaimed refunds remitted as required in this section to the Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission and held for more than two (2) years shall not thereafter be available to any party who may have a claim to the remitted unclaimed refunds, and any claims that arise under this section including claims for the remitted sums shall be forever barred against the Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission and any carrier complying with this section.

The provisions of this section shall apply to any refunds or unclaimed refunds owing and held by a carrier on or after July 15, 1998.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 449, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

393.064.
Presumption of abandonment of stock or dividend of business association. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 3, effective June 16, 1960; 1994, ch. 83, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 95, § 9, effective June 24, 2003; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.066.
Presumption of abandonment of intangible personal property held by fiduciary. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 4, effective June 16, 1960; 2003, ch. 95, § 10, effective June 24, 2003; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.068.
Presumption of abandonment of personal property held by federal government.

All tangible personal property or intangible personal property, including choses in action in amounts certain, and all debts owed or entrusted funds or other property held by the federal government or any federal agency, or any officer, or appointee thereof, shall be presumed abandoned in this state if the last known address of the owner of the property is in this state and the property has remained unclaimed for three (3) years.

The federal government or any federal agency thereof which pays or delivers abandoned property to the department under this section is relieved of all liability to the extent of the value of the property so paid or delivered for any claim which then exists or which thereafter may arise or be made in respect to the property.

The federal government or any federal agency thereof may deduct from the amounts to be paid or delivered to the department the proportionate share of the actual and necessary costs of examining records and reporting such information.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 10, effective June 16, 1960; 1994, ch. 58, § 7, effective March 10, 1994; 2014, ch. 102, § 5, effective April 10, 2014.

393.070.
Deposits not payable on demand — When presumed abandoned. [Repealed.]

393.072.
Presumption of abandonment of property from demutualization of insurance company. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 95, § 6, effective June 24, 2003; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.080.
Presumption of abandonment of security deposit or public utility refund.

The following funds held or owing are presumed abandoned:

Any deposit of money, stocks, bonds, or other credits made to secure payment for services rendered or to be rendered, or to guarantee the performance of services or duties, or to protect against damage or harm, and the increments thereof, unless claimed by the person entitled thereto within three (3) years after the occurrence of the event that would obligate the holder or depository to return it or its equivalent.

Except as provided in KRS

272.291

, any sum which a public utility has been ordered to refund and which was received for utility services rendered in this state, together with any interest thereon, less any lawful deductions, that has remained unclaimed by the person appearing on the records of the utility entitled thereto for more than three (3) years after the date it became payable in accordance with the final determination or order providing for the refund.

If there remains a total of one million dollars ($1,000,000) or more in unclaimed sums one (1) year after a public utility refund became payable in accordance with the final determination or order providing for the refund, excepting sums that may eventually be claimed pursuant to KRS

272.291

, and less any lawful deductions, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall enter into an agreement or agreements with the public utility that will allow the public utility to pay the unclaimed sums, minus the exceptions noted above, to the Kentucky State Treasurer immediately if the Attorney General determines by written opinion that a reasonable relationship exists between the source of and reason for the refund, and the workers’ compensation liability of a bankrupt employer who purportedly was self-insured, either individually or through a self-insurance group, under KRS Chapter 342. Payment of the unclaimed sums to the Kentucky State Treasurer shall constitute a complete release of the public utility from any further responsibility for the sums so paid, and from liability to any person who may have a claim to any of such sums.

The Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission shall preserve the rights of persons or ratepayers entitled to claim a refund under this section, and may utilize any funds available to the agency for the purpose of preserving those rights.

History.

1610: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 7; 1994, ch. 83, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 116, § 1, effective March 28, 1996, retroactive to February 1, 1976; 2003, ch. 95, § 11, effective June 24, 2003.

393.082.
Special expendable trust fund for unclaimed sums under KRS 393.080(3) — Administration and distribution of fund — Claims procedures.

Unclaimed sums delivered to the Kentucky State Treasurer pursuant to KRS 393.080(3) shall be placed in a special expendable trust fund established by the Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission. The Kentucky Workers’ Compensation Funding Commission shall establish a separate trust account with respect to each final determination or order providing for a refund that the Attorney General determines to have a reasonable relationship to the workers’ compensation liability of a bankrupt employer.

The commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims shall be the administrator of the resulting trust fund established pursuant to this section. The commissioner or his or her designee shall be authorized to determine the value of all workers’ compensation claims against the bankrupt employer and to prepare a comprehensive distribution plan. Eligible claimants may elect to participate in a comprehensive distribution plan in exchange for the release of all related claims against the Commonwealth and all of its cabinets, departments, offices, bureaus, agencies, officers, agents, and employees, with the exception of the special fund in the Education and Labor Cabinet. A claimant shall agree as part of a release under this section not to file any future motions to reopen the named workers’ compensation claim or claims, and not to file new claims with respect to the same injury or occupational disease.

A comprehensive distribution plan for unclaimed utility refunds placed in a trust account pursuant to this section shall consist of the full payment of workers’ compensation income benefits for eligible claimants until the fund is exhausted, subject to the exceptions noted in KRS

393.080

and this section, and may include lump-sum settlements in addition to biweekly payment plans. An initial distribution shall be made to eligible claimants after the commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims, or the commissioner’s designee, has made an initial determination of the number of eligible claimants, the amount of income benefits due, and the amount to be retained as a reserve for pending claims. The initial distribution shall include payment of all past due income benefits, without interest, for eligible claimants.

Neither the special fund nor the uninsured employers’ fund shall be considered to be claimants for the purposes of this section. Medical and related benefits shall not be considered in the valuation of the claims unless the amount available in the trust fund clearly exceeds the estimated value of income benefits for all claims. If a workers’ compensation surety bond, letter of credit, or other form of security for the payment of the workers’ compensation liabilities of a bankrupt employer has been collected by the commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims or the Workers’ Compensation Board for distribution to claimants in a manner to be determined by court order, it may be assumed in the valuation of the claims in a comprehensive distribution plan that the security will be distributed by the court on a pro rata basis and an appropriate deduction may be taken.

In preparing the valuation of claims for inclusion in a comprehensive distribution plan, the commissioner or the commissioner’s designee shall deduct special fund payments. Settlement of a workers’ compensation claim as part of a comprehensive distribution plan under this section shall not accelerate the date on which the special fund’s liability becomes due.

If the bankrupt employer ceased business operations at least three (3) years prior to establishment of a trust account pursuant to this section, only claimants who file workers’ compensation claims within sixty (60) days of the establishment of the trust account or before shall be eligible to receive payments from the trust fund.

All claimants shall cooperate with information requests from the Department of Workers’ Claims concerning prior payments of workers’ compensation benefits. The commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims or his or her designee may subpoena witnesses, including present or past managers and officers of the bankrupt employer, and may conduct evidentiary hearings under oath relating to the past and present workers’ compensation liabilities of the bankrupt employer or information relevant to unpaid workers’ compensation benefits. Administrative subpoenas issued under the authority of the commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims for this purpose may be enforced in the Franklin Circuit Court.

The Attorney General shall provide representation of the comprehensive distribution plan as a named defendant in the event the establishment of the trust fund is challenged.

The provisions of KRS 393.080(3) or this section shall not be construed to constitute an admission of the validity of any workers’ compensation claims, nor shall these provisions be interpreted in a manner that would transfer or create liability on behalf of the commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims, any agency, or employee, beyond that expressly set forth in a comprehensive distribution plan.

The special fund shall issue trust fund checks in the amounts and to the claimants or claimants’ representatives as directed by the commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims.

The personnel and other costs of administering a trust fund established pursuant to this section shall be paid out of the investment income of the trust fund.

Attorney fees shall be subject to the limitations and maximum amounts for the payment of attorney’s fees established by KRS

342.320

, as well as the approval of the commissioner or his or her designee.

If a workers’ compensation claimant elects not to participate in a comprehensive distribution plan proposed by the commissioner of the Department of Workers’ Claims or the commissioner’s designee, that claimant shall not be entitled to any portion of the utility refund for the payment of the workers’ compensation benefits. A claimant shall have sixty (60) days following issuance of a comprehensive distribution plan in which to make an election to participate or not.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 116, § 2, effective March 28, 1996; 1996 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 72, effective December 12, 1996; 2010, ch. 24, § 1921, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 236, § 173, effective July 1, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(3/28/96). This section “expire[s] on July 15, 1998, unless continued or modified by law, except that the administration and distribution of trust accounts established prior to that date shall continue until the final payments to eligible claimants have been made.” See 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 116, sec. 3.

393.090.
Presumption of abandonment of intangible personal property not otherwise covered. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1610: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 8; 1962, ch. 144, § 2; 1966, ch. 255, § 267; 2003, ch. 95, § 12, effective June 24, 2003; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.092.
Effect of property owner’s residence in another state. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 13, effective June 16, 1960; 1998, ch. 560, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.095.
Unclaimed pari-mutuel tickets from quarter horse or Appaloosa racetracks. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 29; 1978, ch. 307, § 16, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 84, § 15, effective July 15, 1980; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.100.
Property paid into court — When presumed abandoned — Reversion to municipality or consolidated local government which procured payment into court. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1610: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 50; 2002, ch. 346, § 229, effective July 15, 2002; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.110.
Administrative regulations for reports by holders of abandoned property to report to department — Posting and publication of notices. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1611: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 156, §§ 1, 2; 1944, ch. 53, § 1; 1960, ch. 142, § 9; 1962, ch. 144, § 3; 1966, ch. 239, § 221; 1976, ch. 155, § 27; 1982, ch. 65, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 496, § 28, effective August 1, 1986; 1994, ch. 58, § 8, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 83, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 560, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 95, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. IA.16, § 1, effective March 20, 2005; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.115.
Advertising expenses. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 11, effective June 16, 1960; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.117.
Conditions governing enforceability of agreements to locate property presumed abandoned.

An agreement by an owner, the primary purpose of which is to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property that is presumed abandoned, is void and unenforceable if it was entered into during the period commencing on the date that the property was presumed abandoned and extending to a time that is twenty-four (24) months after the date that the property is paid or delivered to the department. This subsection shall not apply to an owner’s agreement with an attorney to file a claim as to identified property or contest the administrator’s denial of a claim.

An agreement by an owner, the primary purpose of which is to locate, deliver, recover, or assist in the recovery of property and that is not in violation of subsection (1) of this section, is enforceable only if:

The agreement is in writing;

The agreement provides that the fee or compensation agreed upon is an amount not more than ten percent (10%) of the value of the property collected;

The agreement clearly sets forth the nature of the property and the services to be rendered;

The agreement is signed by the apparent owner; and

The agreement states the value of the property before and after the fee or other compensation has been deducted.

An agreement covered by this section that provides for compensation that is unconscionable is unenforceable except by the owner. An owner who has agreed to pay compensation that is unconscionable, or the administrator on behalf of the owner, may maintain an action to reduce the compensation to a conscionable amount. The court may award reasonable attorney’s fees to an owner who prevails in the action.

This section does not preclude an owner from asserting that an agreement covered by this section is invalid on grounds other than unconscionable compensation.

An advertisement, a written communication, or an agreement concerning the location, delivery, recover, or assistance in the recovery of property reported under this chapter shall contain a provision stating that, by law, any contract provision requiring the payment of a fee for finding property that has been held by the administrator for less than twenty-four (24) months is void and not enforceable, and that fees are limited to an amount not more than ten percent (10%) of the value of the property collected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 560, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

393.120.
Sale of property required to be liquidated to pay department. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1612: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 222; 1976, ch. 155, § 28; 1994, ch. 58, § 9, effective March 10, 1994; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.125.
Sale by department. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 560, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.130.
Rights and duties of persons who have transferred property to department. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1613: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 142, § 12; 1994, ch. 58, § 10, effective March 10, 1994; 1998, ch. 560, § 3, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.140.
Claim of interest in property surrendered to state. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1614: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 23; 1966, ch. 239, § 223; 1994, ch. 58, § 11, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 83, § 8, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 560, § 7, effective July 15, 1998; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.150.
State Treasurer to determine claims. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1615: amend. 1994, ch. 58, § 12, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 83, § 9, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 11, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.160.
Appeals from decision of State Treasurer. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1615: amend. Acts 1960, ch. 104, § 21; 1994, ch. 276, § 12, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 95, § 3, effective June 24, 2003; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.170.
Property in federal custody — Determination of whether escheat has occurred.

Whenever any property escheated under this chapter by reason of actual abandonment, or death or presumption of death of the owner without leaving any person entitled to take the legal or equitable title under the laws of this state relating to wills, or descent and distribution, has been deposited with, or in the custody or under the control of, any federal court in and for any district in this state, or in the custody of any depository, clerk or other officer of such court, or has been surrendered by such court or its officers to the United States Treasury, the Circuit Court of any county in which such federal court sits shall have jurisdiction to ascertain whether an escheat has occurred, and to enter a judgment of escheat in favor of the state. This section does not authorize a judgment to require such courts, officers, agents or depositories to pay or surrender funds to this state on a presumption of abandonment as provided in KRS

393A.040

to

393A.140

.

HISTORY:

1616; 2018 ch. 163, § 91, effective July 14, 2018.

393.180.
Proceedings instituted by county attorney on relation of State Treasurer. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1618: amend. 1994, ch. 58, § 13, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 13, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.190.
Assistant Attorney General to aid county attorney. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1618: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 210, § 48; 1994, ch. 58, § 14, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 14, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.200.
State Treasurer may perform duties of county attorney.

If the county attorney declines to perform the duties imposed upon him by this chapter, they may be performed by the State Treasurer. When he considers it to the best interest of the state, the State Treasurer may institute any action authorized by this chapter to be brought by the county attorney, or join the county attorney in the active prosecution of the action.

History.

1618: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 49, effective January 1, 1978; 1994, ch. 58, § 15, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 15, effective July 15, 1994.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 58 and 276. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 276, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Vanlandingham, The Fee System in Kentucky Counties, 40 Ky. L.J. 275 (1952).

393.210.
Property in two or more counties. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1618: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 50, effective January 1, 1978; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.220.
Disposition of tangible property during proceeding. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1618; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.230.
Proceeding to force payment or surrender of intangible property — To establish actual abandonment. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1619: amend. 1994, ch. 58, § 16, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 16, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.240.
Actions may be joined — Procedure for action. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1619: amend. 1994, ch. 58, § 17, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 17, effective July 15, 1994; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.250.
Source of payment of expenses — County attorney to collect judgments.

Any necessary expense required to be paid by the state in administering and enforcing this chapter shall be paid out of the abandoned property fund.

HISTORY:

1620: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 17, § 51, effective January 1, 1978; 1994, ch. 58, § 18, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 83, § 10, effective July 15, 1994; 2003, ch. 95, § 4, effective June 24, 2003; 2018 ch. 163, § 92, effective July 14, 2018.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 58 and 83. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 83, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

393.260.
Limitation of state’s action. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1621; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.270.
Person under disability, extension. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1622; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.280.
Examination of records — Promulgation of administrative regulations and rules — Delegation of State Treasurer’s authority. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1622-1: amend. 1994, ch. 58, § 19, effective March 10, 1994; 1994, ch. 276, § 18, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 560, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2003, ch. 95, § 5, effective June 24, 2003; 2005, ch. 173, Pt. IA.16, § 2, effective March 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 24, § 1922, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.290.
Civil action to enforce production of reports or the surrender of property. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1622-1; 1994, ch. 58, § 20, effective March 10, 1994; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.

393.300.
Restriction on escheat of real property held by lending corporation under supervision.

No person shall institute proceedings to escheat real property the title to which was acquired by any lending corporation in satisfaction of debts previously contracted in the course of its business, or that it purchases under a judgment for any such debt in its favor, if such lending corporation is under the supervision of the Department of Financial Institutions of this state, comptroller of currency of the United States or any other duly constituted supervising banking authority, state or Federal, without first obtaining the consent of the supervising authority having supervision over that corporation.

History.

1623-1; amend. 2010, ch. 24, § 1923, effective July 15, 2010.

393.990.
Penalties. [Repealed]

HISTORY:

1622-1; repealed by 2018 ch. 163, § 93, effective July 14, 2018.